District of Columbia statutes.
42-3141.07

Payment of abatement costs and penalties.

(a)

If a default judgment is issued under § 42-3141.06 or if, after a hearing, the Office of Administrative Hearings finds the owner responsible for the violation set forth in the notice of violation, the District may abate the graffiti and the owner (not the owner’s agent) shall owe to the District 2 1/2 times the District’s abatement costs plus a penalty of $500 for each violation.

(b)

The Mayor shall bill the owner for the amount owed under subsection (a) of this section. If the amount is not paid within 30 days from the date of the bill, interest shall be assessed at the rate of 1 1/2 % per month.

Sept. 18, 2010, D.C. Law 18-219, § 8, 57 DCR 4353
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 8 of Anti-Graffiti Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-389, May 5, 2010, 57 DCR 4332).
This section is referenced in § 42-3141.06 and § 42-3141.11.